src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! # Pronouns

LEXICON pronouns
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = contains the 6 personal

!minä+Pron:min PersSg1  "minä" ;
!sinä+Pron:sin PersSg2  "sinä" ;
!hän+Pron:hä PersSg3  "hän" ;
!minä+Pron:m PersPl1  "me" ;
!sinä+Pron:t PersPl2  "te" ;
!hän+Pron:h PersPl3  "he" ;
